Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-251
County agricultural societies; compliance with act required.

All county agricultural societies existing, organized, or reinstated on or after January 1, 1998, shall comply with the County Agricultural Society Act and shall annually offer and award premiums and perform such other acts which such society deems will be for the improvement of agriculture, industry, homes, and communities of the state. For purposes of the act, county agricultural society means all county agricultural societies existing, organized, or reinstated on or after January 1, 1998.

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 2.